District of Columbia statutes.
2-1384

LGBTQ Homeless Youth Training Grant Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the LGBTQ Homeless Youth Training Grant Fund (“Fund”) which shall be administered by the Office of Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, and Questioning Affairs in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

The Fund shall consist of the revenue from the following sources:

(1)

Appropriated funds; and

(2)

Funds transferred to the Department of Human Services from other District agencies for the purpose of providing services to homeless LGBTQ youth.

(c)

The Fund shall be used for the following purposes:

(1)

The Fund shall be continually available to the Office for the purpose of providing grants to fund trainings on cultural competency for providing services to LGBTQ homeless youth for providers throughout the District. Each grant shall be a 2-year grant.

(2)

The Office shall establish criteria for eligibility to receive a grant; provided, that the cultural competency training conducted through this grant:

(A)

Is conducted by community organizations based in the District with demonstrated ability and expertise in this field;

(B)

Follows best practices in this field regarding content and delivery;

(C)

Includes best practices for data collection pertaining to LGBTQ homeless youth;

(D)

Includes evidence-based family acceptance interventions that shall be youth and family driven, culturally diverse, and tailored to meet the different needs of families from different cultural backgrounds and religions;

(E)

Includes suicide awareness and prevention training; and

(F)

Is subject to a biannual evaluation.

(d)

(1)

The money deposited into the Fund, and any interest earned, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.

(2)

Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds appropriated into the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.

Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-89, § 4a
as added May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-100, § 3(c), 61 DCR 1873
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 1022(d), 62 DCR 10905
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-100 added this section.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “Office of Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, and Questioning Affairs” for “Office of Gay, Lesbian, Bisexual, and Transgender Affairs” in (a).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1022(d) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).